src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NominalDeverbals
+N+Deverbal:yawmang^ # ;
+N+Deverbal:danginj^ # ;

LEXICON NominalPrefixes
+Loc:ku^  AllNounClasses ; ! locative prefix, ie kuwardde == escarpment, or "the rocky place"
+Clitic+In:mi^ AllNounClasses ; ! mingarre: in the vine forest, mikurrurla: in the sea, mikuwardde: in the rocks 



LEXICON NominalSuffixes
    +Gen:^kenh  # ;
    +Gen:^ken   # ;
   +Turn:^wali  # ;
   +Lack:^yak   # ;
    +Loc:^waken # ;
 +Dyadic:^ko    # ;
        :^      # ;
 
LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
# ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected 
# ;
