src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON INounBase
barrken+N+I:barrken NominalSuffixes ;
bininjkobeng+N+I:bininjkobeng NominalSuffixes ;
biwo+N+I:biwo NominalSuffixes ;
djadmud+N+I:djadmud NominalSuffixes ;
djinem+N+I:djinem NominalSuffixes ;
kamarrang+N+I:kamarrang NominalSuffixes ;
kayalak+N+I:kayalak NominalSuffixes ;
kinbarlen+N+I:kinbarlen NominalSuffixes ;
kohbanj+N+I:kohbanj NominalSuffixes ;
kurl+N+I:kurl NominalSuffixes ;
lakkayen+N+I:lakkayen NominalSuffixes ;
mardaka+N+I:mardaka NominalSuffixes ;
mardku+N+I:mardku NominalSuffixes ;
marlbbe+N+I:marlbbe NominalSuffixes ;
marnkol+N+I:marnkol NominalSuffixes ;
momoyak+N+I:momoyak NominalSuffixes ;
mud+N+I:mud NominalSuffixes ;
murnungu+N+I:murnungu NominalSuffixes ;
ngarridj+N+I:ngarridj NominalSuffixes ;
rangem+N+I:rangem NominalSuffixes ;
rin+N+I:rin NominalSuffixes ;
wamud+N+I:wamud NominalSuffixes ;
warlah+N+I:warlah NominalSuffixes ;
yaw+N+I:yaw NominalSuffixes ;
yuhyungki+N+I:yuhyungki NominalSuffixes ;
LEXICON IIINounBase
bardmo+N+III:bardmo NominalSuffixes ;
barle+N+III:barle NominalSuffixes ;
barrarn+N+III:barrarn NominalSuffixes ;
bedje+N+III:bedje NominalSuffixes ;
berd+N+III:berd NominalSuffixes ;
berrk+N+III:berrk NominalSuffixes ;
binik+N+III:binik NominalSuffixes ;
biri+N+III:biri NominalSuffixes ;
birrmurlu+N+III:birrmurlu NominalSuffixes ;
bolh+N+III:bolh NominalSuffixes ;
bornde+N+III:bornde NominalSuffixes ;
bowk+N+III:bowk NominalSuffixes ;
budbud+N+III:budbud NominalSuffixes ;
burrangkali+N+III:burrangkali NominalSuffixes ;
burre+N+III:burre NominalSuffixes ;
danek+N+III:danek NominalSuffixes ;
dangnud+N+III:dangnud NominalSuffixes ;
darl+N+III:darl NominalSuffixes ;
dem+N+III:dem NominalSuffixes ;
diddi+N+III:diddi NominalSuffixes ;
dirnku+N+III:dirnku NominalSuffixes ;
djakkorl+N+III:djakkorl NominalSuffixes ;
djarduk+N+III:djarduk NominalSuffixes ;
djedj+N+III:djedj NominalSuffixes ;
djewk+N+III:djewk NominalSuffixes ;
djoh+N+III:djoh NominalSuffixes ;
djumbak+N+III:djumbak NominalSuffixes ;
djurdurrk+N+III:djurdurrk NominalSuffixes ;
djurrukkumarlba+N+III:djurrukkumarlba NominalSuffixes ;
dubang+N+III:dubang NominalSuffixes ;
dule+N+III:dule NominalSuffixes ;
dulum+N+III:dulum NominalSuffixes ;
gkuwil+N+III:gkuwil NominalSuffixes ;
kabo+N+III:kabo NominalSuffixes ;
karrarndalk+N+III:karrarndalk NominalSuffixes ;
kebkale+N+III:kebkale NominalSuffixes ;
kimanki+N+III:kimanki NominalSuffixes ;
kod+N+III:kod NominalSuffixes ;
kokkarrng+N+III:kokkarrng NominalSuffixes ;
kongkong+N+III:kongkong NominalSuffixes ;
kuladj+N+III:kuladj NominalSuffixes ;
kung+N+III:kung NominalSuffixes ;
kurlurrudj+N+III:kurlurrudj NominalSuffixes ;
lod+N+III:lod NominalSuffixes ;
mile+N+III:mile NominalSuffixes ;
ngalele+N+III:ngalele NominalSuffixes ;
rakel+N+III:rakel NominalSuffixes ;
werrk+N+III:werrk NominalSuffixes ;
yende+N+III:yende NominalSuffixes ;
LEXICON IVNounBase
bak+N+IV:bak NominalSuffixes ;
bang+N+IV:bang NominalSuffixes ;
barlkbu+N+IV:barlkbu NominalSuffixes ;
bende+N+IV:bende NominalSuffixes ;
berle+N+IV:berle NominalSuffixes ;
bidngalanj+N+IV:bidngalanj NominalSuffixes ;
bok+N+IV:bok NominalSuffixes ;
bolkngeyyahwurd+N+IV:bolkngeyyahwurd NominalSuffixes ;
bukkarn+N+IV:bukkarn NominalSuffixes ;
dad+N+IV:dad NominalSuffixes ;
dangwok+N+IV:dangwok NominalSuffixes ;
dedjmim+N+IV:dedjmim NominalSuffixes ;
diw+N+IV:diw NominalSuffixes ;
djakkorl+N+IV:djakkorl NominalSuffixes ;
djen+N+IV:djen NominalSuffixes ;
djorlok+N+IV:djorlok NominalSuffixes ;
djurrh+N+IV:djurrh NominalSuffixes ;
dulk+N+IV:dulk NominalSuffixes ;
dung+N+IV:dung NominalSuffixes ;
kak+N+IV:kak NominalSuffixes ;
kanemrurrk+N+IV:kanemrurrk NominalSuffixes ;
karlang+N+IV:karlang NominalSuffixes ;
karre+N+IV:karre NominalSuffixes ;
keb+N+IV:keb NominalSuffixes ;
kodbarre+N+IV:kodbarre NominalSuffixes ;
kodjmurrng+N+IV:kodjmurrng NominalSuffixes ;
kong+N+IV:kong NominalSuffixes ;
kun+N+IV:kun NominalSuffixes ;
kurlk+N+IV:kurlk NominalSuffixes ;
kurrngirn+N+IV:kurrngirn NominalSuffixes ;
manem+N+IV:manem NominalSuffixes ;
mayorrk+N+IV:mayorrk NominalSuffixes ;
mim+N+IV:mim NominalSuffixes ;
mimnalk+N+IV:mimnalk NominalSuffixes ;
murlun+N+IV:murlun NominalSuffixes ;
ngad+N+IV:ngad NominalSuffixes ;
ngobarn+N+IV:ngobarn NominalSuffixes ;
ngudj+N+IV:ngudj NominalSuffixes ;
njilng+N+IV:njilng NominalSuffixes ;
red+N+IV:red NominalSuffixes ;
rorre+N+IV:rorre NominalSuffixes ;
wanj+N+IV:wanj NominalSuffixes ;
wel+N+IV:wel NominalSuffixes ;
wobe+N+IV:wobe NominalSuffixes ;
wurr+N+IV:wurr NominalSuffixes ;
yidmekanj+N+IV:yidmekanj NominalSuffixes ;
LEXICON VNounBase
adjbud+V+N:adjbud NominalSuffixes ;
baddumang+V+N:baddumang NominalSuffixes ;
badjkid+V+N:badjkid NominalSuffixes ;
baladj+V+N:baladj NominalSuffixes ;
bambam+V+N:bambam NominalSuffixes ;
bangkerreng+V+N:bangkerreng NominalSuffixes ;
barlkkan+V+N:barlkkan NominalSuffixes ;
barrdjungka+V+N:barrdjungka NominalSuffixes ;
bekka+V+N:bekka NominalSuffixes ;
benuk+V+N:benuk NominalSuffixes ;
bibbidj+V+N:bibbidj NominalSuffixes ;
bikkurr+V+N:bikkurr NominalSuffixes ;
bininj+V+N:bininj NominalSuffixes ;
birlmu+V+N:birlmu NominalSuffixes ;
biwudj+V+N:biwudj NominalSuffixes ;
bokung+V+N:bokung NominalSuffixes ;
borlborl+V+N:borlborl NominalSuffixes ;
borndok+V+N:borndok NominalSuffixes ;
bukbuk+V+N:bukbuk NominalSuffixes ;
bulanjdjan+V+N:bulanjdjan NominalSuffixes ;
bumabuma+V+N:bumabuma NominalSuffixes ;
burd+V+N:burd NominalSuffixes ;
burlukkurri+V+N:burlukkurri NominalSuffixes ;
dabborrabbolk+V+N:dabborrabbolk NominalSuffixes ;
daluk+V+N:daluk NominalSuffixes ;
dedded+V+N:dedded NominalSuffixes ;
dikkala+V+N:dikkala NominalSuffixes ;
dirdko+V+N:dirdko NominalSuffixes ;
djabel+V+N:djabel NominalSuffixes ;
djak+V+N:djak NominalSuffixes ;
djalakkiradj+V+N:djalakkiradj NominalSuffixes ;
djalwarra+V+N:djalwarra NominalSuffixes ;
djandi+V+N:djandi NominalSuffixes ;
djarrang+V+N:djarrang NominalSuffixes ;
djenj+V+N:djenj NominalSuffixes ;
djidjnguk+V+N:djidjnguk NominalSuffixes ;
djilikuybi+V+N:djilikuybi NominalSuffixes ;
djirla+V+N:djirla NominalSuffixes ;
djodj+V+N:djodj NominalSuffixes ;
djukerre+V+N:djukerre NominalSuffixes ;
djunj+V+N:djunj NominalSuffixes ;
doddorok+V+N:doddorok NominalSuffixes ;
doydoy+V+N:doydoy NominalSuffixes ;
durruyuk+V+N:durruyuk NominalSuffixes ;
kabbal+V+N:kabbal NominalSuffixes ;
kabo+V+N:kabo NominalSuffixes ;
kala+V+N:kala NominalSuffixes ;
kalidjan+V+N:kalidjan NominalSuffixes ;
kamarrang+V+N:kamarrang NominalSuffixes ;
kandidjdjawa+V+N:kandidjdjawa NominalSuffixes ;
kardab+V+N:kardab NominalSuffixes ;
karlkki+V+N:karlkki NominalSuffixes ;
karndjawarra+V+N:karndjawarra NominalSuffixes ;
karrang+V+N:karrang NominalSuffixes ;
karrawukka+V+N:karrawukka NominalSuffixes ;
karrkkanj+V+N:karrkkanj NominalSuffixes ;
kebbaldjurri+V+N:kebbaldjurri NominalSuffixes ;
kela+V+N:kela NominalSuffixes ;
kinhkinh+V+N:kinhkinh NominalSuffixes ;
kodjkulumak+V+N:kodjkulumak NominalSuffixes ;
komorlo+V+N:komorlo NominalSuffixes ;
kordbolbok+V+N:kordbolbok NominalSuffixes ;
kornobolo+V+N:kornobolo NominalSuffixes ;
kudjewk+V+N:kudjewk NominalSuffixes ;
kukbele+V+N:kukbele NominalSuffixes ;
kuluban+V+N:kuluban NominalSuffixes ;
kunak+V+N:kunak NominalSuffixes ;
kured+V+N:kured NominalSuffixes ;
kurobbe+V+N:kurobbe NominalSuffixes ;
kurrula+V+N:kurrula NominalSuffixes ;
kuyal+V+N:kuyal NominalSuffixes ;
lambarra+V+N:lambarra NominalSuffixes ;
lirrkkurrmeng+V+N:lirrkkurrmeng NominalSuffixes ;
lumaluma+V+N:lumaluma NominalSuffixes ;
madjawarr+V+N:madjawarr NominalSuffixes ;
makkakkurr+V+N:makkakkurr NominalSuffixes ;
malambibbi+V+N:malambibbi NominalSuffixes ;
mararradj+V+N:mararradj NominalSuffixes ;
marebu+V+N:marebu NominalSuffixes ;
marlwa+V+N:marlwa NominalSuffixes ;
marradjiri+V+N:marradjiri NominalSuffixes ;
marrngunj+V+N:marrngunj NominalSuffixes ;
mayh+V+N:mayh NominalSuffixes ;
merlbbe+V+N:merlbbe NominalSuffixes ;
midj+V+N:midj NominalSuffixes ;
mimih+V+N:mimih NominalSuffixes ;
modjarrkki+V+N:modjarrkki NominalSuffixes ;
morlehmorlenj+V+N:morlehmorlenj NominalSuffixes ;
murnubbarr+V+N:murnubbarr NominalSuffixes ;
ngadburrung+V+N:ngadburrung NominalSuffixes ;
